Massachusetts, session 194th, H170.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after
Section 2JJJJJJ, the following section:-
Section 2KKKKKK. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
commonwealth a separate fund, to be known as the Cannabis Products Recall Fund. It shall
consist of amounts credited to the fund in accordance with this section. The commissioner of the
department of public health shall be the custodian of the fund.
(b) The fund shall consist of: (i) funds transferred from the Marijuana Regulation Fund
established in section 14 of chapter 94G; (ii) revenue from appropriations or other money
authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; and (iii)
interest earned on money in the fund. Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to further
appropriation and any money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to
the General Fund.
of 3

(c) Money in the fund shall be expended for mandatory product recalls of any THC-
containing products cultivated, processed, manufactured, delivered or sold by any establishment
in the commonwealth pursuant to section 249 of chapter 111.
(d) The department of public health shall annually, not later than December 31, report on
the activity of the fund to the: (i) joint committee on cannabis policy; joint committee on public
health; (iii) house and senate committees on ways and means; and (iv) clerks of the house of
representatives and senate.
SECTION 2. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 249. (a) Notwithstanding chapter 94G, the commissioner shall adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations for a process to order mandatory product recalls of any THC-
containing products cultivated, processed, manufactured, delivered or sold in any establishment,
and may, in like manner and from time to time, amend, modify or repeal the same. Such rules
and regulations shall be consistent with applicable rules and regulations of the cannabis control
commission or any successor agency with like regulatory powers; provided that, these
requirements are consistent with the most recent research and testing data on marijuana product
safety.
(b) The commissioner shall provide language for the rules and regulations, based on the
most relevant scientific research on the health risks to the consumer of ingesting, injecting or
inhaling products containing THC or derivatives of THC. The cannabis control commission or
any successor agency with like regulatory powers shall determine the best means of distributing
this language to consumers in establishments under the agency’s purview.
of 3

(c) This section shall be funded by Cannabis Products Recall Fund established in section
2KKKKKK of chapter 29.
of 3